Wyoming, session 2025, SF0096.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-4-1306 is created to read:
9-4-1306. State treasurer duties; consultants;
rulemaking authority.
(a) The state treasurer shall implement this article
by:
(i) Holding not less than ten million dollars
($10,000,000.00) in specie and specie legal tender in the
permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund for the purpose of
diversifying the state's investment portfolio, preserving
capital and insuring against inflation, debt defaults and
other risks;
(ii) If market conditions warrant, investing in
precious metal leases or bonds payable in precious metals.
(b) The state treasurer may contract for services
with established precious metals firms and other industry
experts to assist with the duties of the treasurer under
this section. The state treasurer shall require financial
disclosures along with any other requirements specified by
the state treasurer before engaging in any contract under
this subsection.
Section 2.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0096
ENROLLED ACT NO. 13, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(a) The department of revenue shall conduct a study
that reviews methods for the state to begin accepting gold
and silver as a payment medium.
(b) The department of revenue shall submit the
results of the study required under subsection (a) of this
section and any recommendations for legislation resulting
from the study to the joint revenue interim committee and
the select committee on capital financing and investments
not later than October 1, 2025.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0096
ENROLLED ACT NO. 13, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.
(b) Section 1 of this act is effective January 1,
2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3